vi: Mức độ mạnh chất chống mồ hôi: Độ mạnh lâm sàng; Độ mạnh tối đa; Độ mạnh thông thường; Độ mạnh thể thao; Khác
pt-PT: Nível de eficácia do antitranspirante: Força clínica; Força máxima; Força regular; Força desportiva; Outro
nb: Antiperspirantstyrkenivå: Klinisk styrke; Maksimal styrke; Vanlig styrke; Sport styrke; Annet
hr-HR: Razina snage antiperspiranta: Klinička jačina; Maksimalna jačina; Regularna jačina; Sportska jačina; Ostalo
ja: 制汗剤強度レベル: 臨床強度; 最大強度; 通常強度; スポーツ強度; その他
sk-SK: Úroveň sily antiperspirantu: Klinická sila; Maximálna sila; Bežná sila; Športová sila; Iné
nl: Anti-transpirant krachtniveau: Klinische sterkte; Maximale sterkte; Normale sterkte; Sportsterkte; Andere
pl: Poziom mocy antyperspirantu: Siła kliniczna; Maksymalna siła; Zwykła siła; Siła sportowa; Inne
tr: Ter önleyici güç seviyesi: Klinik güç; Maksimum güç; Normal güç; Spor gücü; Diğer
el: Επίπεδο ισχύος αντιιδρωτικού: Κλινική ισχύς; Μέγιστη ισχύς; Κανονική ισχύς; Αθλητική ισχύς; Άλλο
sv: Antiperspirantens styrkenivå: Klinisk styrka; Maximal styrka; Normal styrka; Sportstyrka; Övrigt
lt-LT: Antiperspiranto stiprumo lygis: Klinikinis stiprumas; Maksimalus stiprumas; Įprastas stiprumas; Sportinis stiprumas; Kita
de: Antitranspirant-Stärkegrad: Klinische Stärke; Maximale Stärke; Normale Stärke; Sport-Stärke; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Nível de força do antitranspirante: Força clínica; Força máxima; Força regular; Força esportiva; Outro
cs: Úroveň síly antiperspirantu: Klinická síla; Maximální síla; Běžná síla; Sportovní síla; Jiné
es: Nivel de fuerza del antitranspirante: Fuerza clínica; Fuerza máxima; Fuerza regular; Fuerza deportiva; Otros
zh-CN: 止汗剂强度等级: 临床强度; 最大强度; 常规强度; 运动强度; 其他
fi: Antiperspirantin voimakkuustaso: Kliininen vahvuus; Maksimivahvuus; Normaalivahvuus; Urheilu vahvuus; Muu
fr: Niveau d’efficacité de l’anti-transpirant: Force clinique; Force maximale; Force régulière; Force sport; Autre
it: Livello di forza dell'antitraspirante: Forza clinica; Forza massima; Forza normale; Forza sport; Altro
da: Antiperspirantstyrkeniveau: Klinisk styrke; Maksimal styrke; Normal styrke; Sportsstyrke; Andet
bg-BG: Ниво на сила на антиперспиранта: Клинична сила; Максимална сила; Обичайна сила; Спортна сила; Други
en: Anti-perspirant strength level: Clinical strength; Maximum strength; Regular strength; Sports strength; Other
hu: Izzadásgátló erősségi szint: Klinikai erősségű; Maximális erősségű; Normál erősségű; Sport erősségű; Egyéb
ko: 발한 억제제 강도 수준: 의료용 강도; 최대 강도; 일반 강도; 스포츠 강도; 기타
sl-SI: Stopnja moči antiperspiranta: Klinična moč; Maksimalna moč; Običajna moč; Športna moč; Drugo
ru: Уровень силы антиперспиранта: Клиническая сила; Максимальная сила; Обычная сила; Спортивная сила; Другой
th: ระดับความแรงของสารระงับเหงื่อ: ระดับคลินิก; ความแรงสูงสุด; ความแรงปกติ; ความแรงสำหรับกีฬา; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Nivelul de eficacitate al antiperspirantului: Putere clinică; Putere maximă; Putere normală; Putere pentru sport; Altele
zh-TW: 止汗劑強度: 醫療級強度; 最高強度; 一般強度; 運動強度; 其他